Utah statutes.
78B-6-1605.   Reservation of legal options -- Ordinances.

(1) (a)  This part may not be construed as a waiver by a local entity of a right to seek reimbursement for actual costs of response services through another legal remedy or procedure.

(b)  The procedure provided for in this part is in addition to any other civil or criminal statute.

(c)  This part does not limit the authority of a law enforcement officer or private citizen to make an arrest for a criminal offense arising out of conduct regulated by this part.

(2)  A local entity may impose by ordinance a stricter provision related to the conduct of an underage drinking gathering, including the imposition of a different civil penalty amount, except that the ordinance shall provide that a civil penalty for an underage drinking gathering may only be imposed by a local entity for which an emergency response provider provides services at the underage drinking gathering.

